Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 1. In General
§ 33-3-116.
Certified public accountant; holders of certificates in sister states.

The board may allow practice privileges as follows:

An individual whose principal place of business is not in this state and who holds a valid license as a certified public accountant from any state which the board, or its designee as determined by board rule and as provided in W.S.

33-3-109

(o), has determined to be in substantial equivalence with subsection (c) of this section shall be presumed to have qualifications substantially equivalent to this state’s requirements and shall have all the privileges of certificate holders of this state without the need to obtain a certificate under W.S.

33-3-109

. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an individual who offers or renders professional services, whether in person or by mail, telephone or electronic means, under this subsection shall be granted practice privileges in this state and no notice, fee or other submission shall be required of the individual. Any individual practicing under this paragraph shall be subject to the requirements of paragraph (a)(iii) of this section;

An individual whose principal place of business is not in this state and who holds a valid license as a certified public accountant from any state which the board, or its designee as determined by board rule and as provided in W.S. 33-3-109(o), has not determined to be in substantial equivalence with the certified public accountant licensure requirements of subsection (c) of this section shall be presumed to have qualifications substantially equivalent to this state’s requirements and shall have all the privileges of certificate holders of this state without the need to obtain a certificate under W.S. 33-3-109 if the individual obtains from the board or its designee verification that the individual’s certified public accountant qualifications are substantially equivalent to the certified public accountant licensure requirements of subsection (c) of this section. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an individual who offers or renders professional services, whether in person or by mail, telephone or electronic means, under this subsection shall be granted practice privileges in this state and no notice, fee or other submission shall be required of the individual. Any individual practicing under this paragraph shall be subject to the requirements of paragraph (a)(iii) of this section;

An individual licensee of another state exercising the privileges afforded under this subsection and the firm which employs that licensee simultaneously consents as a condition of the grant of this privilege:

To the personal and subject matter jurisdiction and disciplinary authority of the board;

To comply with this act and any board rules;

That in the event the license from the state of the individual’s principal place of business is no longer valid, the individual will cease offering or rendering professional services in this state individually and on behalf of a firm; and

To the appointment of the state board which issued their license as their agent upon whom process may be served in any action or proceeding by the board against the licensee.

An individual who qualifies for practice privileges under this subsection shall only provide services through a firm which has obtained a permit issued under W.S.

33-3-118

when performing the following services for any entity with its home office in this state:

Providing any financial statement audit or other engagement to be performed in accordance with statements on auditing standards;

Providing any examination of prospective financial information to be performed in accordance with statements on standards for attestation engagements; or

Providing any engagement to be performed in accordance with public company accounting oversight board auditing standards.

A licensee of this state offering or rendering services or using his certified public accountant title in another state shall be subject to disciplinary action in this state for any act committed in another state for which the licensee would be subject to discipline. Notwithstanding W.S.

33-3-123

, the board shall investigate any complaint made by the board of accountancy of another state.

An individual shall be deemed to meet the substantial equivalency requirements of this state if he meets the requirements of paragraph (i) or (ii) of this subsection:

The individual holds a valid license as a certified public accountant from any state that requires as a condition of licensure that the individual:

Completes at least one hundred fifty (150) semester hours of college education including a baccalaureate or higher degree conferred by a college or university;

Achieves a passing grade on the uniform certified public accountant examination; and

Possesses at least one (1) year experience including providing any type of service or advice involving the use of accounting, attest, compilation, management advisory, financial advisory, tax or consulting skills, which may be obtained through government, industry, academic or public practice verified by a licensee or the equivalent of a licensee as determined by the board.

The individual holds a valid license as a certified public accountant from any state that does not meet the requirements of paragraph (i) of this subsection but the individual has otherwise met the requirements of paragraph (i) of this subsection or substantially similar requirements. Any individual who passed the uniform certified public accountant examination prior to January 1, 2012 may be exempted from the educational requirements in subparagraph (c)(i)(A) of this subsection for purposes of this paragraph.

Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to prohibit an individual who qualifies for practice privileges under this section from applying for a Wyoming certified public accountant certificate.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-23.67; 1996, ch. 27, § 1; 2005, ch. 1, § 1; 2006, ch. 57, § 1; 2009, ch. 99, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the section, which formerly allowed waiver for persons holding a certificate, license or degree in a foreign country recognizing them as qualified to practice certified public accounting.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, inserted “or a similar recognized credential,” and “or foreign country.”

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote the section, which read: “The board may issue a certificate as a certified public accountant to any person who holds a certificate of a certified public accountant or a similar recognized credential, then in full force and effect, issued under the laws of any state or foreign country when that person meets requirements which are substantially equivalent to the requirements set forth in W.S. 33-3-109(a)(ii) through (v).”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-3-102(a)(xv).

§ 33-3-117.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 1, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1975, ch. 179, § 1, allowed for the organization of corporations for the practice of public accounting.

§ 33-3-118.
Certified public accountant firms.

A certified public accounting firm that has been issued a permit under this act may practice in any form of organization allowed by state law.

through (iii) Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 1, § 2.

The board shall grant or renew a permit to a certified public accounting firm demonstrating its qualifications in accordance with this section:

through (viii) Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 1, § 2.

through (xii) Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 99, § 2.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the following shall be required to hold a permit issued under this section:

Any firm with an office in this state performing any attest services as defined in W.S. 33-3-102(a)(vi) or any compensated public accounting services described in W.S.

33-3-109

(c) for members of the general public provided by certified public accountants who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board under this act;

Any firm with an office in this state that uses the title “CPA” or “CPA firm”.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 2, § 2.

A firm which does not have an office in this state may perform attest services described in W.S. 33-3-102(a)(vi) or compilation services described in W.S. 33-3-102(a)(ix) for a client having its home office in this state and may use the title “CPA” or “CPA firm” without a permit issued under this section if:

The firm has the qualifications described in paragraph (xvi) of this subsection and W.S.

33-3-132

; and

The firm performs the services through an individual with practice privileges under W.S. 33-3-116(a).

A firm which is not subject to the requirements of paragraph (xiii) or (xiv) of this subsection may perform other professional services while using the title “CPA” or “CPA firm” without a permit if:

The firm performs the services through an individual with practice privileges under W.S. 33-3-116(a); and

The firm can lawfully perform those services in the state where the individual with practice privileges has his principal place of business.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, at least a simple majority of the ownership of the firm, in terms of financial interests and voting rights of all partners, officers, shareholders, members or managers, shall belong to holders of a certificate who are licensed in some state and those partners, officers, shareholders, members or managers whose principal place of business is in this state and who perform professional services in this state shall hold a valid certificate issued under W.S.

33-3-109

or the corresponding provision of prior law. Firms may include noncertificate holder owners but the firm and its ownership shall comply with rules promulgated by the board;

Any firm may include nonlicensed owners provided that:

The firm designates a certificate holder of this state, or in the case of a firm which is required to have a permit pursuant to W.S. 33-3-116(a)(iv) a licensee of another state who meets the requirements of W.S. 33-3-116(a), who is responsible for the proper registration of the firm and the firm identifies that individual to the board;

All nonlicensed owners shall be active individual participants in the firm or the firm’s affiliated entities;

The firm complies with any other requirements imposed by board rules;

Any firm which is not in compliance with the requirements of this paragraph due to changes in firm ownership or personnel after receiving or renewing a permit shall take corrective action to bring the firm back into compliance. The board, through rule and regulation, shall specify a period of time for firms to take corrective action. Failure to take corrective action may be grounds for suspension or revocation of the permit issued under this section.

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 1, § 2.

This section shall not be applied to prohibit any officer or employee of the state or federal government or political subdivision thereof from performing his official duties.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-23.69; Laws 2005, ch. 1, §§ 1, 2; 2006, ch. 57, § 1; 2009, ch. 99, §§ 1, 2; 2019 ch. 2, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 2, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the section, which formerly provided requirements for registration as a partnership or corporation of certified public accountants.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, added (d).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in the introductory language of (b) inserted “or renew” preceding “a permit” and substituted “demonstrating its qualifications in accordance with this section” for “engaged in the practice of public accounting if it meets all of the qualifications specified in the following paragraphs”; repealed former (b)(ix) through (b)(xii), which read: “(ix) Each resident manager in charge of a Wyoming office and each partner, shareholder or member who is a certified public accountant and is engaged within Wyoming in the practice of public accounting shall hold an active Wyoming certificate;

“(x) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, at least a simple majority of the ownership of the firm, in terms of financial interests and voting rights of all partners, officers, shareholders, members or managers, shall belong to certificate holders who hold active certificates, licenses or permits in some state. Although firms may include noncertificate holder owners, the firm and its ownership shall comply with rules promulgated by the board;

“(xi) Any certified public accounting firm may include noncertificate holders provided that the firm designates a certificate holder of this state who is responsible for the proper registration of the firm and identifies that individual to the board. All noncertificate holders shall actively participate in the certified public accounting firm. The designated certificate holder shall be responsible for all notifications required by this act and the rules and regulations of the board;

“(xii) Any certified public accounting firm which is not in compliance with paragraph (x) of this subsection due to changes in firm ownership or personnel after receiving or renewing a permit shall take corrective action to bring the firm back into compliance. The board through rules and regulations shall grant a period of time for a firm to take corrective action. Failure to do so may result in the suspension or revocation of the firm permit.”; added (b)(xiii) through (b)(xvii); and deleted the former first sentence in (d), which read: “All attest services as defined in this act and performed by certificate holders shall be performed within firms permitted under this section.”

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 2, §
1, effective July 1, 2019, in (b)(xiii)(A), added “or any compensated public accounting services described in W.S. 33-3-109(c) for members of the general public provided by certified public accountants who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board under this act;”; at the end of (b)(xiii)(B), added a period and deleted “; and”; in (b)(xiv), added “attest”, substituted “33-3-102(a)(vi)(B)” for “33-3-102(a)(vi)” and added “compilation services described in W.S.”

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 2, §
2, effective July 1, 2019, repealed former (b)(xiii)(C) which read: “Any firm that does not have an office in this state but performs attest services described in W.S. 33-3-102(a)(vi)(A), (C) or (D) for a client having its home office in this state.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the others, all have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-3-102(a)(xv).

Personal liability of corporate accountants. —

Nothing in the nature of the statutory changes in the certified public accountants licensing statutes of this chapter can be found changing the historical right of the Wyoming Board of Certified Public Accountants to require personal liability of the practitioner, regardless of his corporate entity status, for the quality of service in the interest of providing protection for the public. Porter Muirhead Cornia & Howard v. State, 844 P.2d 479,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 196

(Wyo. 1992).

§ 33-3-119.
Accounting offices; registration.

An applicant for initial issuance or renewal of a permit to practice under W.S.

33-3-118

shall register the firm and provide a list of all offices of the firm within the state to the board and shall provide evidence that all attest and compilation services rendered in the state are under the charge of a person holding a valid license issued under W.S.

33-3-109

or the corresponding provision of prior law or the laws of some other state. The board shall by regulation prescribe the procedure to be followed in effecting these registrations.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-23.70; Laws 2005, ch. 1, § 1; 2009, ch. 99, § 1; 2019 ch. 2, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “an active Wyoming certificate” for “a permit,” and deleted the former next-to-last sentence which read: “The resident manager may serve in that capacity at one (1) office only.”

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote the former first and second sentences as the present first sentence.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted "the firm and provide a list of all offices" for "each office" and substituted "to" for "with".

Advertising office as that of certified public accountant. —

There was no clear and convincing evidence that an accountant advertised an office of a certified public accountant within the meaning of the statute, notwithstanding findings by the board of certified public accountants that (1) the office was listed on the building directory as a CPA office; (2) a sign posted on the office door stated that the accountant's firm was available on an appointment basis and listed contact telephone numbers; (3) informational pamphlets entitled “Divorce: Yours, Mine or Ours” with the accountant's firm listed on them were available to the public in the office; (4) business mail was received at the office; (5) the accountant met a client at the office; and (6) a certificate of organization was on file at the Wyoming Secretary of State's office, which stated that the accountant's business was the practice of accountancy within the state of Dorr v. State Bd., 2001 WY 37, 21 P.3d 735,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 2001).

§ 33-3-120.
Permits; annual fee; renewal; requirements.

Permits to engage in the practice of public accounting as a certified public accountant firm in Wyoming shall be issued by the board to certified public accountant firms registered under this act if all offices of the registrant in Wyoming are maintained and registered as required under W.S.

33-3-119

.

There shall be an annual permit fee to be determined by the board in accordance with W.S.

33-1-201

. All permits shall expire on the last day of December of each year and may be renewed annually for a period of one (1) year by registrants who meet the requirements specified in subsection (a) of this section and upon payment of the annual permit fee. In accordance with W.S.

33-1-201

the board may by rule establish a fee in addition to the annual permit fee to reactivate an expired firm permit.

through (g) Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 1, § 2.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-23.71; Laws 1983, ch. 112, § 1; 1987, ch. 89, § 1; 1996, ch. 27, § 1; 1999, ch. 25, § 1; 2005, ch. 1, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 99, § 1; 2019 ch. 2, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the section, deleting provisions pertaining to failure to apply for renewal within three years of the expiration date of a permit, failure to provide satisfaction of continuing education requirements, the granting of inactive status, experiential requirements, and the definition of “the practice of public accounting.”

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, inserted “in Wyoming” preceding “are maintained” in (a); and in (b) deleted “not exceeding three hundred dollars ($300.00)” preceding “to be determined” and added “in accordance with W.S.

33-1-201

” in the first sentence, and substituted “in accordance with W.S.

33-1-201

”
for “, not to exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00),” in the last sentence.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (b), substituted for "In accordance with W.S.

33-1-201

the board may by rule establish a fee in addition to the annual permit fee to reactivate an expired firm permit." for "If the annual permit fee is not paid by the first day of November, a late renewal fee as set by the board in accordance with W.S.

33-1-201

shall be added to the renewal fee".

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-3-102(a)(xv).

§ 33-3-121.
Certificates and permits; disciplinary action; grounds.

After notice and hearing, the board may revoke, refuse to renew, reprimand, censure, limit the scope of practice, place on probation with or without terms, conditions or limitations, or may suspend for a period not to exceed two (2) years, any certificate issued under this act or practice privilege or may revoke, suspend, limit the scope of practice, or refuse to renew any permit issued under this act or may censure the holder of a permit for any of the following causes:

Fraud or deceit in obtaining a certificate as certified public accountant or in obtaining a permit under this act;

Dishonesty, fraud or gross negligence by a certificate holder or individual granted practice privileges:

In the practice of public accounting; or

In the filing or failure to file the holder’s or the individual’s own income tax return.

Violation of any of the provisions of this act;

Violation of any rule promulgated by the board under the authority granted by this act;

Conviction of a felony that relates to the practice of accounting or to the ability to practice accounting under the laws of Wyoming or any other state or of the United States;

Conviction of any crime, an element of which is dishonesty or fraud, under the laws of Wyoming or any state or of the United States;

Cancellation, revocation, suspension or refusal to renew the authority to practice as a certified public accountant by any other state for any cause other than failure to pay a fee;

Permanent revocation of the right to practice before any state or federal agency;

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 1, § 2.

Failure of a certificate holder to furnish evidence showing the satisfaction of the requirements of continuing education required by the board;

Failure of a certificate or permit holder to show compliance with W.S.

33-3-132

regarding practice monitoring programs;

Making any false or misleading statement or verification in support of an application for a license filed by another;

Performance of any fraudulent act while holding a license or privilege issued under this act or prior version of this act.

Upon receipt from the department of family services of a certified copy of an order from a court to withhold, suspend or otherwise restrict a certificate or permit issued by the board or a practice privilege, the board shall notify the party named in the court order of the withholding, suspension or restriction of the certificate, practice privilege or permit in accordance with the terms of the court order. No appeal under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall be allowed for a certificate, practice privilege or permit withheld, suspended or restricted under this subsection.

In lieu of or in addition to any disciplinary action specifically provided in subsection (a) of this section, the board may require a certificate, practice privilege or permit holder to complete such continuing professional education programs as the board may specify or undergo peer review or preissuance review as the board may specify.

The board may recover from a disciplined person any of the following:

Reasonable costs associated with an investigation that leads to disciplinary action including a reasonable hourly rate for the time devoted by board members, expert witnesses or attorneys investigating or prosecuting the matter and all reasonable related travel costs;

Direct costs to the board of conducting a disciplinary hearing that leads to disciplinary action.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-23.72; 1997, ch. 49, § 2; ch. 128, § 2; 2005, ch. 1, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 99, § 1; 2018 ch. 107, § 2, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 2, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a) added additional disciplinary actions; repealed former (a)(ix), pertaining to failure of a certificate holder to obtain a permit within three years from the last expiration date; in (a)(xi), inserted “certificate or”; in (b) substituted “certificate or permit” for “license” three times; and added (c).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, inserted “or practice privilege” preceding “or may revoke” in the introductory language of (a); substituted “this act” for “W.S.

33-3-125

through

33-3-127

” in (a)(iii); substituted “of any rule promulgated” for “of a rule promulgated” in (a)(iv); and in (b) and (c) inserted “or a practice privilege” and “practice privilege”.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(v), inserted “that relates to the practice of accounting or to the ability to practice accounting” following “felony.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(ii), added “by a certificate holder or individual granted practice privileges”; added designation (a)(ii)(A); added (a)(ii)(B), (a)(xii) and (a)(xiii), and made related changes; in (c), added “or preissuance review”; and added (d).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-3-102(a)(xv).

There is no impermissible delegation of authority

by the state regulatory agency in requiring certified public audits to conform to existent national standards of accounting practice. Christensen v. Wyoming Bd. of Certified Pub. Accountants, 838 P.2d 723,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 1992).

Standard of review is whether decision supported by evidence. —

Reviewing court will not separately undertake a factual analysis following the administrative agency determination; the authority to make discretional decisions about standards of CPA auditing practices is invested exclusively in the State Board, and therefore the review standard is a determination of whether the decision can be supported by evidence found in the entire record. Christensen v. Wyoming Bd. of Certified Pub. Accountants, 838 P.2d 723,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 1992).

Suspension of accountant's certificate to practice was proper, where substantial evidence showed that accountant participated in the audit prior to having approval to do so, and thus he violated a settlement agreement from a prior disciplinary action and engaged in dishonesty in violation of W.S. 33-3-121(a)(ii) when he attempted to legitimize his activity by using other accountants as the signing auditors. While the violation of the settlement agreement, alone, probably did not amount to dishonesty under W.S. 33-3-121(a)(ii), the accountant's attempt to legitimize his activity was dishonest.
Dorr v. Wyoming Bd., 2006 WY 144, 146 P.3d 943,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(2006).

Dishonesty not shown. —

An accountant's failure to inform a client of a restriction placed on his ability to conduct audits by a settlement agreement did not amount to dishonesty in the practice of public accounting since (1) the agreement did not require that he inform a prospective audit client that his license was restricted, and (2) when he was contacted about performing an audit, he immediately filed a request with the board of certified public accountants to conduct the audit and to initiate the pre-issuance review required by the settlement agreement. Dorr v. State Bd., 2001 WY 37, 21 P.3d 735,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 2001).

Cited

in

Danculovich v. Brown, 593 P.2d 187,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 397

(Wyo. 1979); Wyoming Bd. of CPAs v. Christensen, 800 P.2d 853,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1990).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of independent accountant to investors or shareholders, 35 ALR4th 225.

§ 33-3-122.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 1, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1975, ch. 179, § 1, provided for disciplinary actions for partnerships or corporations for failure to meet all of the necessary qualifications.

§ 33-3-123.
Initiation of disciplinary proceedings; conduct of proceedings.

The board may initiate proceedings under this act on its own motion or on the written complaint of any person. All proceedings before the board shall be conducted under the rules and regulations adopted by the board and in accordance with the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [§§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

].

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-23.74.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-3-102(a)(xv).

No exhaustion of remedies for contract appeal. —

A dispute over a settlement agreement between the board and an accountant resolving a disciplinary action against the accountant involved a contract matter and not an administrative disciplinary proceeding; no administrative remedies remained to be exhausted, and the district court had jurisdiction over the contract case. Wyoming Bd. of Certified Pub. Accountants v. Christensen, 800 P.2d 853,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1990).

Cited

in

Dorr v. State Bd. of CPAs, 2001 WY 37, 21 P.3d 735,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 2001).

§ 33-3-124.
Reinstatement of certificate or permit for good cause shown.

Upon written application and after a hearing attended by the applicant or the applicant’s legal representative and for good cause shown, the board may do any of the following:

Issue a new certificate to the applicant whose certificate has been revoked;

Reissue or modify the suspension of any certificate;

Restore an applicant’s scope of practice, practice privilege or permit which has been revoked or suspended.

If the applicant or the applicant’s legal representative fails to appear at the hearing, the board may proceed to hear evidence against the applicant and may enter an appropriate order, which shall be final.

A certificate, practice privilege or permit suspended or restricted under W.S. 33-3-121(b) may be reissued without the hearing required under this section if the department of family services provides notice that the applicant has complied with the terms of the court order that resulted in the suspension or restriction of the certificate, practice privilege or permit.

The applicant shall bear all costs related to a reinstatement hearing before the board.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-23.75; 1997, ch. 128, § 2; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2005, ch. 1, § 1; 2009, ch. 99, § 1; 2019 ch. 2, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “33-3-121(b)” for “33-2-121(b).”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted language pertaining to certificates and permits for language pertaining to licenses throughout, and made stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, inserted “, practice privilege” following “certificate” wherever it appears.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, rewrote the section which read as: “Upon written application and after hearing and for good cause shown, the board may issue a new certificate to a certified public accountant whose certificate has been revoked or may reissue or modify the suspension of any certificate, practice privilege or permit which has been revoked or suspended. A certificate, practice privilege or permit suspended or restricted under W.S. 33-3-121(b) may be reissued without the hearing required under this section if the department of family services provides notice that the applicant has complied with the terms of the court order that resulted in the suspension or restriction of the certificate, practice privilege or permit.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 33-3-125.
Certified public accountant; use of designation; requirements.

Except as permitted by the board under W.S. 33-3-109(f) and (g), no person shall assume or use the title or designation “certified public accountant” or the abbreviation “CPA” or any other title, designation, words, letters, abbreviation, sign, card or device tending to indicate that the person is a certified public accountant unless the person has received a certificate as a certified public accountant under the provisions of this act or has a practice privilege under W.S. 33-3-116(a).

No organization shall use the title or designation “certified public accountant” or the abbreviation “CPA” or any other title, designation, words, letters, abbreviation, sign, card or device tending to indicate that the organization is composed of certified public accountants unless the organization is registered as a certified public accountant firm under the provisions of this act and the certified public accountant firm holds a permit or is exempt from registration under W.S. 33-3-118(b)(xiv) or (xv).

and (d) Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 2, § 2.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, it shall not be a violation of this act for a firm which does not hold a valid permit under W.S.

33-3-118

and which does not have an office in this state to provide its professional services and practice public accounting in this state if it complies with the requirements of W.S.

33-3-118

(b)(xiv) or (xv).

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-23.76; Laws 2005, ch. 1, § 1; 2009, ch. 99, § 1; 2019 ch. 2, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to order enjoining acts or practices in violation of this section, see §

33-3-129

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “organization” and “certified public accountant firm” for “partnership or corporation” or similar language throughout (b); added (c) and (d); updated an internal reference; and made stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added “or has a practice privilege under W.S. 33-3-116(a)” in (a); added “or is exempt from registration under W.S. 33-3-118(b)(xiv) or (xv)” in (b); inserted “or practice privilege” following “certificate” in (c) and (d); and added (e).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, repealed former (c) which read: "A person who does not hold a certificate or practice privilege under this act and who completes a review shall only use the following safe harbor language or other nonstatements on standards for accounting and review services language, “I (We) have reviewed the accompanying (financial statement) of the (name of entity) as of (time period) for the (period) then ended. These financial statements (information) are (is) the responsibility of the company's management. I (We) have not audited the accompanying financial statements and accordingly do not express an opinion or any other form of assurance on them."; and repealed former (d) which read: "A person who does not hold a certificate or practice privilege under this act and completes a compilation service shall only use the following safe harbor language or other nonstatements on standards for accounting and review services language, “I (We) have compiled the accompanying (financial statement) of (name entity) as of (time period) for the (period) then ended. This compilation is limited to preparing in the form of financial statements information that is the representation of management (owners). I (We) have not audited or reviewed the accompanying financial statements and accordingly do not express an opinion or any other form of assurance on them.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-3-102(a)(xv).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of statute or regulation restricting use of terms such as “accountant,” “public accountant,” or “certified public accountant,” 4 ALR4th 1201.

§ 33-3-126.
Use of misleading terms or abbreviations prohibited.

No person or organization shall use the title or designation “certified accountant”, “chartered accountant”, “enrolled accountant”, “registered accountant”, “accredited accountant” or any other title or designation likely to be confused with “certified public accountant” or any of the abbreviations “CA”, “RA”, or “AA”, or similar abbreviations likely to be confused with “CPA”. This section shall not prohibit the use of the term “public accountant” or the initials “PA”.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-23.77; Laws 2005, ch. 1, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to order enjoining acts or practices in violation of this section, see §

33-3-129

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “organization” for “partnership or corporation” and deleted “EA” from the list of abbreviations.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of statute or regulation restricting use of terms such as “accountant,” “public accountant,” or “certified public accountant,” 4 ALR4th 1201.

§ 33-3-127.
Certified public accountant firm; wording used; requirements.

No person shall assume or use the title or designation “certified public accountant” in conjunction with names indicating or implying that there is an organization, or in conjunction with the designation “and Company” or “and Co.” or a similar designation if there is in fact no bona fide organization registered under the provisions of this act or under the provisions of a similar state act.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-23.78; Laws 2005, ch. 1, § 1; 2009, ch. 99, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to order enjoining acts or practices in violation of this section, see §

33-3-129

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, twice substituted “organization” for “partnership or corporation.”

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added “or under the provisions of a similar state act” following “provisions of this act”.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-1-102(a)(xv).

§ 33-3-128.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 1, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1975, ch. 179, § 1, allowed for the use of the designation “certified public accountant” or “CPA” under specified circumstances.

§ 33-3-129.
Unlawful act or practice; injunction or other order.

Whenever any person has engaged in any acts or practices which constitute or will constitute a violation of any provision of W.S.

33-3-125

through

33-3-127

, the board may make application to the appropriate court for an order enjoining such acts or practices, and upon a showing by the board that the person has engaged in any illegal acts or practices, an injunction, restraining order or other appropriate order shall be granted by such court without bond.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-23.80.

Cited

in

Wyoming Bd. of CPAs v. Christensen, 800 P.2d 853,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1990).

§ 33-3-130.
Violation; penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of W.S.

33-3-125

through

33-3-127

is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or be imprisoned not more than twelve (12) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 179, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-23.81; Laws 2005, ch. 1, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “one thousand dollars ($1,000.00)” for “one hundred dollars ($100.00),” deleted “in the county jail,” and substituted “twelve (12) months” for “six (6) months.”